de: Verwendungszweck des Poliertuchs für Holzblasinstrumente: Allzweck; Polieren der Außenfläche; Entfernung von Fingerabdrücken/Schmutz; Trocknung/Reinigung der Innenbohrung; Polieren der Klappenmechanik; Reinigung/Polieren des Mundstücks; Polstertrocknung (Pad-Saver-Tuch); Zapfen-/Korkreinigung; Sonstige
ko: 목관악기 광택용 천의 용도: 다목적용; 외부 바디 마감 폴리싱; 지문/얼룩 제거; 내부 관 건조/세척; 키워크 폴리싱; 마우스피스 세척/폴리싱; 패드 건조(패드 세이버 천); 테논/코르크 세척; 기타
sl-SI: Predvidena uporaba krpe za poliranje lesenih pihal: Večnamensko; Poliranje zunanje obdelave trupa; Odstranjevanje prstnih odtisov/madežev; Sušenje/čiščenje notranjosti cevi; Poliranje mehanike; Čiščenje/poliranje ustnika; Sušenje blazinic (krpica za zaščito blazinic); Čiščenje spojev/plute; Drugo
it: Uso previsto del panno per la lucidatura degli strumenti a fiato: Multiuso; Lucidatura finitura del corpo esterno; Rimozione di impronte/sbavature; Asciugatura/pulizia foro interno; Lucidatura chiavi; Pulizia/lucidatura bocchino; Asciugatura tamponi (panno salvasaliva); Pulizia perno/sughero; Altro
pt-PT: Utilização prevista do pano de polimento para sopros de madeira: Para todos os fins; Polimento do acabamento do corpo exterior; Remoção de impressões digitais/manchas; Limpeza/secagem do orifício interior; Polimento das chaves; Limpeza/polimento da boquilha; Secagem das sapatilhas (pano protetor de sapatilhas); Limpeza do espigão/cortiça; Outro
tr: Nefesli çalgı parlatma bezi kullanım amacı: Çok amaçlı; Dış gövde cilası parlatma; Parmak izi/leke çıkarma; İç boşluk kurulama/temizleme; Tuş takımı parlatma; Ağızlık temizleme/parlatma; Yastık/ped kurulama (ped koruyucu bez); Zıvana/mantar temizliği; Diğer
sv: Avsedd användning för polerduk för träblås: Universal; Polering av utvändig yta; Borttagning av fingeravtryck/fläckar; Torkning/rengöring av insidan; Polering av klaffmekanik; Rengöring/polering av munstycke; Torkning av putor (pad saver-duk); Rengöring av tapp/kork; Övrigt
da: Tilsigtet brug af pudseklud til træblæserinstrument: All-round; Polering af udvendig finish; Fjernelse af fingeraftryk/pletter; Tørring/rengøring af indvendig boring; Polering af mekanik; Rengøring/polering af mundstykke; Tørring af puder (pad saver-klud); Rensning af tap/kork; Andet
nb: Tiltenkt bruk av poleringsklut for treblåsere: Universell; Polering av utvendig overflate; Fjerning av fingeravtrykk/smuss; Tørking/rengjøring av innvendig boring; Klaffepolering; Rengjøring/polering av munnstykke; Putetørking (putebeskytterklut); Rengjøring av tapp/kork; Annet
bg-BG: Предназначение на кърпа за полиране на дървени духови инструменти: Мултифункционална; Полиране на външното покритие на корпуса; Премахване на отпечатъци/петна; Подсушаване/почистване на вътрешния отвор; Полиране на механизмите; Почистване/полиране на мундщука; Подсушаване на клапите (кърпа за предпазване на клапите); Почистване на шийката/корка; Друго
vi: Khăn lau nhạc cụ hơi: Đa năng; Đánh bóng lớp phủ bề mặt ngoài; Loại bỏ dấu vân tay/vết ố; Làm khô/làm sạch lòng ống bên trong; Đánh bóng phím; Làm sạch/đánh bóng ống ngậm; Làm khô miếng đệm (khăn bảo vệ miếng đệm); Vệ sinh mộng/nút bần; Khác
lt-LT: Medinių pučiamųjų poliravimo šluostės paskirtis: Universalus; Išorinės korpuso apdailos poliravimui; Pirštų atspaudų / dėmių valymui; Vidinės angos džiovinimui / valymui; Vožtuvų mechanizmo poliravimui; Kandiklio valymui / poliravimui; Pagalvėlių džiovinimui (apsauginė šluostė pagalvėlėms); Sąvaržos / kamščio valymui; Kita
nl: Houten blaasinstrument poetsdoek beoogd gebruik: Multifunctioneel; Polijsten van afwerking buitenkant; Vingerafdrukken/vlekken verwijderen; Drogen/schoonmaken van binnenboring; Klepmechaniek polijsten; Mondstuk schoonmaken/polijsten; Polster drogen (polsterdoekje); Pen-/kurkreiniging; Overige
pl: Przeznaczenie ściereczki do polerowania instrumentów dętych drewnianych: Uniwersalne; Polerowanie zewnętrznej powierzchni; Usuwanie odcisków palców/smug; Osuszanie/czyszczenie wnętrza; Polerowanie mechanizmu klap; Czyszczenie/polerowanie ustnika; Osuszanie poduszek (ściereczka typu pad saver); Czyszczenie czopów/korków; Inne
pt-BR: Pano de polimento para madeira de sopro uso pretendido: Multiuso; Polimento do acabamento do corpo externo; Remoção de marcas de dedos/manchas; Secagem/limpeza da cavidade interna; Polimento de chaves; Limpeza/polimento da boquilha; Secagem das sapatilhas (pano protetor); Limpeza do encaixe/cortiça; Outro
cs: Zamýšlené použití leštěnky pro dřevěné dechové nástroje: Víceúčelové; Leštění vnější povrchové úpravy těla; Odstraňování otisků prstů / šmouh; Sušení/čištění vnitřního vrtání; Leštění klapek; Čištění/leštění náustku; Sušení podlepky (hadřík na ochranu podlepky); Čištění čepu/korku; Jiné
fr: Usage prévu du chiffon de polissage pour instrument de la famille des bois: Multi-usage; Polissage de finition extérieure du corps; Élimination des empreintes/taches; Séchage/nettoyage de la perce intérieure; Polissage du clétage; Nettoyage/polissage du bec; Séchage des tampons (chiffon protège-tampon); Nettoyage de tenon/liège; Autre
sk-SK: Účel použitia leštiacej handričky na drevené dychové nástroje: Viacúčelové; Leštenie vonkajšieho povrchu tela; Odstraňovanie odtlačkov prstov/šmúh; Sušenie/čistenie vnútorného vŕtania; Leštenie mechaniky; Čistenie/leštenie náustka; Sušenie podušiek (ochranná handrička); Čistenie čapov/korku; Iné
ru: Назначение салфетки для духовых инструментов: Универсальная; Полировка внешней отделки корпуса; Удаление отпечатков пальцев / пятен; Сушка / чистка внутреннего канала; Полировка клапанного механизма; Чистка / полировка мундштука; Сушка подушек (ткань для защиты подушек); Чистка шипов/пробок; Другое
zh-TW: 木管樂器擦拭布預期用途: 多用途; 外部管身拋光; 去除指紋/污漬; 內部管徑乾燥/清潔; 按鍵拋光; 吹嘴清潔/拋光; 墊片乾燥 (護墊布); 榫頭/軟木清潔; 其他
es: Uso previsto del paño de pulido para instrumentos de viento de madera: Multiuso; Pulido del acabado exterior del cuerpo; Eliminación de huellas dactilares/manchas; Secado/limpieza del tubo interior; Pulido de llaves; Limpieza/pulido de la boquilla; Secado de zapatillas (paño protector de zapatillas); Limpieza de espiga/corcho; Otro
en: Woodwind polishing cloth intended use: All-purpose; Exterior body finish polishing; Fingerprints/smudge removal; Interior bore drying/cleaning; Keywork polishing; Mouthpiece cleaning/polishing; Pad drying (pad saver cloth); Tenon/cork cleaning; Other
zh-CN: 木管乐器抛光布预期用途: 多用途; 外部管身漆面抛光; 去除指纹/污迹; 内膛干燥/清洁; 按键抛光; 吹嘴清洁/抛光; 皮垫干燥（皮垫保护布）; 榫头/软木清洁; 其他
ro-RO: Utilizarea prevăzută a lavetei de lustruit pentru instrumente de suflat din lemn: Universal; Lustruire finisaj exterior al corpului; Îndepărtare amprente/pete; Uscare/curățare alezaj interior; Lustruire clape; Curățare/lustruire muștiuc; Uscare pernițe (lavetă de protecție pentru pernițe); Curățare cep/plută; Altele
hu: Fafúvós hangszerhez való polírozókendő rendeltetésszerű használata: Univerzális; Külső felület polírozása; Ujjlenyomat/folteltávolítás; Belső furat szárítása/tisztítása; Billentyűzet polírozása; Fúvóka tisztítása/polírozása; Párnaszárítás (párnavédő kendő); Csap/parafa tisztítás; Egyéb
hr-HR: Namjena krpe za poliranje drvenih puhaćih instrumenata: Višenamjenska; Poliranje vanjske obrade tijela; Uklanjanje otisaka prstiju / mrlja; Sušenje/čišćenje unutarnjeg otvora; Poliranje tipki; Čišćenje/poliranje usnika; Sušenje jastučića (krpica za čuvanje jastučića); Čišćenje spojeva/pluta; Ostalo
th: ผ้าสำหรับขัดเครื่องเป่าลมไม้ วัตถุประสงค์การใช้งาน: อเนกประสงค์; ขัดเงาผิวตัวเครื่องด้านนอก; เช็ดรอยนิ้วมือ/รอยเปื้อน; เช็ดแห้ง/ทำความสะอาดท่อด้านใน; ขัดเงากลไกคีย์; ทำความสะอาด/ขัดเงาปากเป่า; เช็ดนวมให้แห้ง (ผ้าเช็ดนวม); ทำความสะอาดเดือย/ไม้ก๊อก; อื่นๆ
fi: Puupuhaltimen kiillotusliinan käyttötarkoitus: Yleiskäyttö; Rungon ulkopinnan kiillotus; Sormenjälkien/tahrojen poisto; Sisäporauksen kuivaus/puhdistus; Koneiston kiillotus; Suukappaleen puhdistus/kiillotus; Tyynyjen kuivaus (pad saver -liina); Tapin/korkin puhdistus; Muu
el: Προβλεπόμενη χρήση πανιού γυαλίσματος ξύλινων πνευστών: Πολλαπλών χρήσεων; Γυάλισμα εξωτερικού φινιρίσματος; Αφαίρεση δακτυλικών αποτυπωμάτων/κηλίδων; Στέγνωμα/καθαρισμός εσωτερικής οπής; Γυάλισμα κλειδιών; Καθαρισμός/γυάλισμα επιστομίου; Στέγνωμα ταμπόν (πανί προστασίας ταμπόν); Καθαρισμός τένοντα/φελλού; Άλλο
ja: 木管楽器用研磨クロスの用途: 多目的; 外装ボディ仕上げ磨き; 指紋/汚れの除去; 内管の乾燥/清掃; キイワーク磨き; マウスピースの清掃/磨き; パッド乾燥 (パッドセーバークロス); テノン/コルククリーニング; その他